North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-46 Emergency Medical Services

23-46-01.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

“Emergency medical services funding area” means a geographic area eligible for state assistance and includes one or more licensed ambulance operations.

“Minimum reasonable cost” means the cost of operating one transporting ambulance service or the sum of the cost to operate one transporting ambulance service and any combination of one substation and one quick response unit.

“Required local matching funds” means revenue generated by the provision of emergency medical services, local mill levies, local sales tax, local donations, and in-kind donations of services.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 197, § 2.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2011.

Cross-References.

Emergency medical services generally, licensing, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-27.

Trauma and emergency medical system, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-01.2.

23-46-02.
Emergency medical services advisory council. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall establish an emergency medical services advisory council. The council must include at least three representatives appointed by an emergency medical services organization, one individual to represent basic life support and one individual to represent advanced life support, both appointed by the state health officer, and other members designated by the state health officer, not to exceed a total of fourteen members. The department shall consider the recommendations of the council on the plan for integrated emergency medical services in the state, development of emergency medical services funding areas, development of the emergency medical services funding areas application process and budget criteria, and other issues relating to emergency medical services as determined by the state health officer. Council members are entitled to reimbursement for expenses in the manner provided in section 44-08-04. The department shall establish by policy the length of terms and the method for rotation of membership.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 197, § 2.

23-46-02.
Emergency medical services advisory council. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall establish an emergency medical services advisory council. The council must include at least three representatives appointed by an emergency medical services organization, one individual to represent basic life support and one individual to represent advanced life support, both appointed by the executive director of the department of health and human services or designee, and other members designated by the executive director of the department of health and human services or designee, not to exceed a total of fourteen members. The department of health and human services and the state health officer shall consider the recommendations of the council on the plan for integrated emergency medical services in the state, development of emergency medical services funding areas, development of the emergency medical services funding areas application process and budget criteria, and other issues relating to emergency medical services as determined by the executive director of the department of health and human services or the state health officer. Council members are entitled to reimbursement for expenses in the manner provided in section 44-08-04. The department of health and human services shall establish by policy the length of terms and the method for rotation of membership.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 197, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 262, effective September 1, 2022.

23-46-03.
Emergency medical services funding areas. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall establish and update biennially a plan for integrated emergency medical services in this state. The plan must identify ambulance operations areas, emergency medical services funding areas that require state financial assistance to operate a minimally reasonable level of emergency medical services, and a minimum reasonable cost for an emergency medical services operation. The department shall designate emergency medical services funding areas based on criteria adopted by the health council and published in the North Dakota Administrative Code.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 197, § 2.

23-46-03.
Emergency medical services funding areas. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall establish and update biennially a plan for integrated emergency medical services in this state. The plan must identify ambulance operations areas, emergency medical services funding areas that require state financial assistance to operate a minimally reasonable level of emergency medical services, and a minimum reasonable cost for an emergency medical services operation. The department shall designate emergency medical services funding areas based on criteria adopted by rule of the department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 197, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 263, effective September 1, 2022.

23-46-04.
State financial assistance for emergency medical services — Confidential information — Annual allocation. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Emergency medical services operations that request financial assistance from the state must provide requested fiscal information to the state department of health for use in financial assistance determinations. All information provided to the department under this section is confidential. The state department of health shall determine annually the allocation amount of state financial assistance for each emergency medical services funding area based on the department’s determination of the minimum annual funding necessary to operate the emergency medical services operation or service designated to operate in the ambulance funding area, based on the financial needs unique to each emergency medical services funding area.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 197, § 2; 2019, ch. 213, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

23-46-04.
State financial assistance for emergency medical services — Confidential information — Annual allocation. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Emergency medical services operations that request financial assistance from the state must provide requested fiscal information to the department of health and human services for use in financial assistance determinations. All information provided to the department under this section is confidential. The department of health and human services shall determine annually the allocation amount of state financial assistance for each emergency medical services funding area based on the department’s determination of the minimum annual funding necessary to operate the emergency medical services operation or service designated to operate in the ambulance funding area, based on the financial needs unique to each emergency medical services funding area.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 197, § 2; 2019, ch. 213, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 264, effective September 1, 2022.

23-46-05.
State financial assistance for emergency medical services — Distribution limit. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 35, § 10.